North Dakota, session 69, HB1082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 36-25-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
36-25-01. Definitions.
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Board" means the state board of animal health.
2. "Commissioner" means the agriculture commissioner.
3. "Farmed elk" means mammals of the elk family (cervus elaphus), except red deer,North
American elk genus and species (cervus canadensis) confined in a manmade enclosure
designed to prevent escape and:
a. Raised for fiber, meat, or animal byproducts;
b. Raised for breeding, exhibition, or harvest; or
c. Maintained for any other purpose.
4. "Owner" means a person who owns or is responsible for the raising of farmed elk.

H. B. NO. 1082 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1082.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State